Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.320

Certain pharmacists exempted from licensing provisions.

The license provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any pharmacist who is licensed pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW and does not distribute any pesticide required to be registered under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 32.]